Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 10
REINSTATEMENT OF DISSOLVED ENTITIES

7-90-1001. Reinstatement after dissolution.

Any domestic entity as to which a constituent filed document has been filed by, or placed in the records of, the secretary of state and that has been dissolved may be reinstated under this part 10; except that this part 10 shall not apply to domestic general partnerships or to limited partnerships formed under article 61 of this title that have not elected to be governed by article 62 of this title.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part added, p. 2311, § 217, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1494, § 242, effective July 1.

7-90-1002. Vote or consent required - effect of opposition.

An entity eligible for reinstatement under section 7-90-1001 may be reinstated upon compliance with the following conditions:

The affirmative vote or consent shall have been obtained from owners and other persons entitled to vote or consent at that time that is:

Required for reinstatement under its constituent operating document; or

If its constituent operating document does not state the vote or consent required for reinstatement, sufficient for dissolution under the organic statutes, or such greater or lesser vote or consent as is required for dissolution under its constituent operating document;

Except as otherwise provided in the constituent operating document, the owners and other persons having authority under the entity's organic statutes and under its constituent operating document to bring about or prevent dissolution of the entity shall not have, before or at the time of the vote or consent required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), voted against reinstatement or delivered to the entity their written objection to reinstatement;

In the case of an entity dissolved in an involuntary or judicial proceeding initiated by one or more of the owners, the affirmative vote or consent of each such owner shall have been obtained and shall be included in the vote or consent required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (1);

In the case of an entity dissolved in a proceeding initiated by one or more creditors of the entity, the obligations of the entity to each such creditor shall have been satisfied or discharged in full; and

In the case of an entity dissolved in a proceeding initiated by the attorney general, all grounds for the dissolution asserted by the attorney general shall have been remedied, and the attorney general shall have consented to the reinstatement.

To the extent that an entity's constituent operating document or the organic statutes provide for the voting rights of owners or other persons, for the calling of meetings, for notices of meetings, for consents and actions of owners and other persons without a meeting, for establishing a record date for meetings, or for other matters concerning the voting or consent of owners and other persons, such provisions shall govern the vote or consent required by paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of this section with respect to the entity and the vote or objection of owners and other persons provided for in paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of this section with respect to the entity.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part added, p. 2311, § 217, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

IP(1), (1)(a)(II), (1)(b), (1)(c), and (2) amended, p. 1494, § 243, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(1)(b) and (2) amended and (3) added, p. 1216, § 21, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(3) repealed, (HB 22-1250), ch. 80, p. 398, § 8, effective August 10.

7-90-1003. Articles of reinstatement.

In order to reinstate an entity under this part 10, articles of reinstatement shall be delivered to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of this article stating:

The domestic entity name of the entity;

The domestic entity name of the entity following reinstatement, which entity name shall comply with section

7-90-1004

;

The date of formation of the entity;

The Colorado statute under which the entity existed immediately prior to its dissolution;

The date of dissolution of the entity, if known;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2006, p. 878, § 65, effective July 1, 2006.)

A statement that all applicable conditions of section

7-90-1002

have been satisfied;

The principal office address of the entity's principal office; and

The registered agent name and registered agent address of the entity's registered agent.

If the constituent-filed document referred to in section 7-90-1001 is no longer in the publicly-accessible electronic records of the secretary of state at the time articles of reinstatement are delivered to the secretary of state for filing, the entity shall cause a true and complete copy of its constituent filed document to be attached to its articles of reinstatement.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part added, p. 2312, § 217, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2005:

(1)(a) and (1)(e) amended, p. 1217, § 22, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(a.5) added and (1)(e) amended, p. 878, § 65, effective July 1.

7-90-1004. Entity name upon reinstatement.

The domestic entity name of a domestic entity following reinstatement shall be the domestic entity name, determined without regard to section 7-90-601.5, of the domestic entity at the time of reinstatement if such domestic entity name complies with section 7-90-601 at the time of reinstatement. If that domestic entity name does not comply with section 7-90-601, the domestic entity name of the domestic entity following reinstatement shall be that domestic entity name followed by the word "reinstated" and the month, day, and year of the effective date of the articles of reinstatement.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part added, p. 2313, § 217, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1495, § 244, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 1217, § 23, effective October 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 879, § 66, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1248), ch. 252, p. 1134, § 19, effective May 14.

7-90-1005. Effect of reinstatement.

Subject to subsection (2) of this section, upon reinstatement, the existence of the entity shall be deemed for all purposes to have continued without interruption; the entity resumes carrying on its business or conducting its activities as if dissolution had never occurred; any debt, obligation, or liability incurred by the entity or an owner or manager of the entity before or after the dissolution shall be determined as if dissolution had never occurred; and, if the entity was, at the time of its dissolution, a limited liability limited partnership, it continues, upon reinstatement, to be a limited liability limited partnership.

The rights of owners and other persons arising by reason of reliance on the dissolution before those persons had notice of the reinstatement shall not be adversely affected by the reinstatement.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part added, p. 2313, § 217, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1495, § 245, effective July 1.